Utah statutes.
13-50-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Repair work" means any work done to siding, gutters, a roof system, or a window system to repair damage caused by wind or hail.

(2)  "Residential building" means a single or multiple family dwelling of up to four units.

(3)  "Residential contractor" means a person that, for compensation, other than wages as an employee, contracts or offers to contract to perform repair work on a residential building.

(4)  "Roof system" includes roof coverings, roof sheathing, roof weatherproofing, roof framing, roof ventilation, and roof insulation.



Enacted by Chapter 160, 2013 General Session

